Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-103.03
Interest; how computed.

All payments made prior to trial by or on behalf of the defendant shall be subtracted from the judgment before interest as provided in subsection (1) of section 45-103.02 is added.

Laws 1986, LB 298, § 4;

Laws 1994, LB 1183, § 4.